Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 13 Private Home Care Providers

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for private home care providers, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-65.

31-7-300.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Companion or sitter tasks” means the following tasks which are provided to elderly, handicapped, or convalescing individuals: transport and escort services; meal preparation and serving; and household tasks essential to cleanliness and safety. These tasks do not include assistance with bathing, toileting, grooming, shaving, dental care, dressing, and eating.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Personal care tasks” means assistance with bathing, toileting, grooming, shaving, dental care, dressing, and eating; and may include but are not limited to proper nutrition, home management, housekeeping tasks, ambulation and transfer, and medically related activities, including the taking of vital signs only in conjunction with the above tasks.

“Private home care provider” means any person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, that directly provides or makes provision for private home care services through:

Its own employees who provide nursing services, personal care tasks, or companion or sitter tasks;

Contractual arrangements with independent contractors who are health care professionals licensed pursuant to Title 43; or

Referral of other persons to render home care services, when the individual making the referral has ownership or financial interest in the delivery of those services by those other persons who would deliver those services.

“Private home care services” means those items and services provided at a patient’s residence that involve direct care to that patient and includes, without limitation, any or all of the following:

Nursing services, provided that such services can only be provided by a person licensed under Chapter 26 of Title 43;

Personal care tasks; and

Companion or sitter tasks.

Private home care services shall not include physical, speech, or occupational therapy; medical nutrition therapy; medical social services; or home health aide services provided by a home health agency.

“Residence” means the place where an individual makes that person’s permanent or temporary home, whether that person’s own apartment or house, a friend or relative’s home, or a personal care home, but shall not include a hospital, nursing home, hospice, or other health care facility licensed under Article 1 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-300

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-23/SB 433; Ga. L. 2015, p. 336, § 2/HB 183.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 336, § 1/HB 183, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Home Care Patient Protection Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on administrative law, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2021).

31-7-301.
License requirement; license not assignable or transferable.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, on and after July 1, 1996, no person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, may operate as a private home care provider without first obtaining a license or provisional license from the department.
A license issued under this article is not assignable or transferable.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-301

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

31-7-302.
Rules and regulations; authority of department to issue, suspend, or revoke licenses.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this article.
The department is authorized to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses or take other disciplinary actions against licensees as provided in Code Section 31-2-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-302

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-7-303.
Inspections; requirements for exemption.

Each private home care provider for which a license has been issued shall be inspected by the department periodically; provided, however, the department may exempt a provider from inspections if it is certified or accredited by a certification or accreditation entity recognized and approved by the department. A provider seeking exemption from inspection shall be required to submit to the department documentation of certification or accreditation, including a copy of its most recent certification or accreditation report.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-303

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1.

31-7-304.
Fees.

The department is authorized to charge an application fee, a license fee, a license renewal fee, or a similar fee; and the amount of such fees shall be established by the Board of Community Health.
Each fee so established shall be reasonable and shall be determined in such a manner that the total of the fees charged shall approximate the total of the direct and the indirect costs to the state of the operation of the licensing program.
Fees may be refunded for good cause as determined by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-304

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-5/HB 228.

31-7-305.
Exempt services.

This article shall not apply to private home care services which are provided under the following conditions:

When those services are provided directly by an individual, either with or without compensation, and not by agents or employees of the individual and not through independent contractors or referral arrangements made by an individual who has ownership or financial interest in the delivery of those services by others who would deliver those services;

When those services are home infusion therapy services and the intermittent skilled nursing care is provided only as an integral part of the delivery and infusion of pharmaceuticals, but such skilled nursing care, whether hourly or intermittent, which provides care licensed by this article beyond the basic delivery and infusion of pharmaceuticals is not exempt;

When those services are provided through the temporary placement of professionals and paraprofessionals to perform those services in places other than a person’s residence;

When those services are provided by home health agencies which are licensed under Article 7 of this chapter;

When those services are provided in a personal care home by the staff of the personal care home;

When those services are services within the scope of practice of pharmacy and provided by persons licensed to practice pharmacy; and

When those services are provided directly by an individual on a volunteer basis through a senior volunteer program, which includes the foster grandparent program, the senior companion program, and the retired and senior volunteer program. In no case shall there be remuneration to any person, firm, corporation, or volunteer for services rendered or coordination of services in conjunction with the senior volunteer program or the foster grandparent program.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-305

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 586, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “article” was substituted for “Act” in paragraph (2).

31-7-306.
Applications received prior to effective date of article.

A person, business entity, corporation, or association which has applied for a license pursuant to this article prior to July 1, 1996, but which has not been granted such license within 180 days after rules implementing this article have become effective shall be authorized to continue to operate without such license until 90 days after the application for license has been denied.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-306

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

31-7-307.
Certificate of need not required of licensees; operation of licensee as home health agency not authorized.

A certificate of need issued pursuant to Chapter 6 of this title is not required for any person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, which is operating as a private home care provider as long as such operation does not also constitute such person, entity, or organization operating as a home health agency or personal care home under this chapter.

A license issued under this article shall not entitle the licensee to operate as a home health agency, as defined in Code Section 31-7-150, under medicare or Medicaid guidelines.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-307

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 959, § 1.

31-7-308.
Licensure and regulation of private home care providers transferred to Department of Community Health.

Effective July 1, 2009, all matters relating to the licensure and regulation of private home care providers pursuant to this article shall be transferred from the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) to the Department of Community Health.

The Department of Community Health shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Community Health by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Department of Community Health. In all such instances, the Department of Community Health shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources, and the Department of Community Health shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the Department of Community Health in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of community health. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Community Health on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the Department of Community Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-308

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-24/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-32/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-40/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”